Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska32-206
Official election calendar; publish; contents; delivery of copy; filing or other acts; time.

(1) The Secretary of State shall publish an official election calendar by November 1 prior to the statewide primary election. Such calendar, to be approved as to form by the Attorney General, shall set forth the various election deadline dates and other pertinent data as determined by the Secretary of State. The official election calendar shall be merely a guideline and shall in no way legally bind the Secretary of State or the Attorney General.

(2) The Secretary of State shall deliver a copy of the official election calendar to the state party headquarters of each recognized political party within ten days after publication under subsection (1) of this section.

(3) Except as provided in sections 32-302, 32-304, and 32-306, any filing or other act required to be performed by a specified day shall be performed by 5 p.m. of such day, except that if such day falls upon a Saturday, Sunday, or legal holiday, performance shall be required on the next business day.

Laws 1994, LB 76, § 26;

Laws 2012, LB878, § 1;

Laws 2014, LB1048, § 1;

Laws 2018, LB1038, § 1.